wichi.lexc
!!!wichi.lexc!!!

!!!TODO: Guesser using slot-filling

Multichar_Symbols %<V%> %<1SUB.Sg%> %<1SUB.Pl.Incl%> %<1SUB.Pl.Excl%>
                        %<2SUB%>    %<2SUB.Sg%>
                        %<3SUB%>    %<3SUB.Sg%>
                        %<1OBJ%>    %<1OBJ.Sg%>      %<1OBJ.Pl%>
                        %<2OBJ%>    %<2OBJ.Sg%>      %<2OBJ.Pl%>
                        %<3OBJ%>    %<3OBJ.Sg%>      %<3OBJ.Pl%>
                  %<N%> %<PosCLSF%> %<UNK%>
                  lh th fw ch
                  %<DET%> %<3POS.Pl%> %<3P.Pl%> %<1P.Pl.Excl%> %<3P.Sg%>
                  %<1P.Sg%> %<IndObj%> %<COMING%> %<GOING%> %<AFFIX%> %<PST%>
                  %<PREF%> %<SUFF%> %<1P.Pl.Pos%> %<DIMIN%> %<DEMON%> %<PLURAL%>
                  %<AUG%>

LEXICON Root

Noun        ;
VerbSubject ;
Verb        ;
Classifier  ;
Pronoun     ;
Determiner  ;
Affix       ;

LEXICON Noun

asinoj                              NounInf;
atsina                              NounInf;
fwala                               NounInf;
lhayis                              NounInf;
thayis                              NounInf;
tela                                NounInf;
honat                               NounInf;
tañi                                NounInf;
tewok                               NounInf;
niyat                               NounInf;
itoj                                NounInf;

LEXICON NounInf

%<N%>:0                             #;
%<N%>:0                             Affix;

LEXICON VerbSubject

%<1SUB.Sg%>:na^                     Verb;
%<1SUB.Sg%>:ni^                     Verb;
%<1SUB.Sg%>:no^                     Verb;
%<1SUB.Pl.Incl%>:to^                Verb;
%<1SUB.Pl.Incl%>:ta^                Verb;
%<1SUB.Pl.Excl%>:o^                 Verb;
%<2SUB%>:la^                        Verb;
%<3SUB%>:0                          Verb;

LEXICON Verb

chufwen                             VerbInf;
wen                                 VerbInf;
yahin                               VerbInf;
tische                              VerbInf;
tischey                             VerbInf;
amo                                 VerbInf;
welh                                VerbInf;
yik                                 VerbInf;
tichun                              VerbInf;
iwu                                 VerbInf;
yenlhi                              VerbInf;
yenthi                              VerbInf;
yiset                               VerbInf;
tachahuye                           VerbInf;
tachum                              VerbInf;
tachume                             VerbInf;
tek                                 VerbInf;
talawk                              VerbInf;
neche                               VerbInf;
hape                                VerbInf;

LEXICON VerbInf

%<V%>:0                             #;
%<V%>:0                             Affix;

LEXICON Affix

%<PLURAL%>:^hen                     #;
%<COMING%>:^tso                     #;
%<GOING%>:^tsi                      #;
%<AFFIX%>:pej^                      Verb;
%<AFFIX%>:pej^                      Affix;
%<AFFIX%>:pej^                      VerbSubject;
%<AFFIX%>:^pej                      #;
%<AFFIX%>:pej                       #;
%<PST%>:^pante                      #;
%<PST%>:pante                       #;
%<PREF%>:olhai^                     Verb;
%<PREF%>:olhai^                     Affix;
%<PREF%>:olhai^                     VerbSubject;
%<PREF%>:lhai^                      Verb;
%<PREF%>:lhai^                      Affix;
%<PREF%>:lhai^                      VerbSubject;
%<PREF%>:oya^                       Verb;
%<PREF%>:oya^                       Affix;
%<PREF%>:oya^                       VerbSubject;
%<PREF%>:ona^                       Verb;
%<PREF%>:ona^                       Affix;
%<PREF%>:ona^                       VerbSubject;
%<PREF%>:a^                         Verb;
%<PREF%>:a^                         Affix;
%<PREF%>:a^                         VerbSubject;
%<PREF%>:le^                        Verb;
%<PREF%>:le^                        Affix;
%<PREF%>:le^                        VerbSubject;
%<PREF%>:fwi^                       Verb;
%<PREF%>:fwi^                       Affix;
%<PREF%>:fwi^                       VerbSubject;
%<PREF%>:math^                      Verb;
%<PREF%>:math^                      Affix;
%<PREF%>:math^                      VerbSubject;
%<SUFF%>:^la                        #;
%<SUFF%>:^lhi                       #;
%<SUFF%>:^ta                        #;
%<1P.Pl.Pos%>:lha^                  Verb;
%<1P.Pl.Pos%>:lha^                  Affix;
%<1P.Pl.Pos%>:lha^                  VerbSubject;
%<DIMIN%>:^fwaj                     #;
%<DIMIN%>:fwaj                      #;
%<DEMON%>:^na                       #;
%<DEMON%>:na                        #;
%<PLURAL%>:^y                       #;
%<PLURAL%>:^j                       #;
%<PLURAL%>:^i                       #;
%<PLURAL%>:^i                       Affix;
%<AUG%>:^taj                        #;
%<AUG%>:taj^                        Verb;
%<AUG%>:taj^                        Affix;
%<AUG%>:taj^                        VerbSubject;
%<AUG%>:taj^                        #;

LEXICON Pronoun

%<1SUB.Sg%>:na                      #;
%<1SUB.Sg%>:ni                      #;
%<1SUB.Sg%>:no                      #;
%<1SUB.Pl.Incl%>:to                 #;
%<1SUB.Pl.Incl%>:ta                 #;
%<1SUB.Pl.Excl%>:o                  #;
%<3POS.Pl%>:la                      #;
%<3P.Pl%>:thamel                    #;
%<3P.Pl%>:lhamel                    #;
%<1P.Pl.Excl%>:olhamel              #;
%<3P.Sg%>:tham                      #;
%<3P.Sg%>:lham                      #;
%<1P.Sg%>:otham                     #;
%<1P.Sg%>:olham                     #;
%<IndObj%>:noho                     #;

LEXICON Classifier

ko                                  ClassifierInf;
ka                                  ClassifierInf;
lo                                  ClassifierInf;

LEXICON ClassifierInf

%<PosCLSF%>:0                       #;

LEXICON Determiner

ta                                  DeterminerInf;
taha                                DeterminerInf;
tanai                               DeterminerInf;

LEXICON DeterminerInf

%<DET%>:0                           #;
